California, session 20252026, AB708.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 124241.2 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:124241.2. (a) A youth tackle football league, youth sports organization that conducts a tackle football program, or coach of a youth sports organization shall allow youth tackle football participants to use safety equipment, including soft-shelled add-ons on football helmets. (b) In addition to other remedies, a A court may grant a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction to remedy a violation or threatened violation of this section. (c) A prevailing plaintiff who obtains any remedy specified in subdivision (b) shall be entitled to an award of reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.